fr: Repliage hors utilisation: Bras/berceaux pliables; Se plie à plat pour le rangement; Se plie contre le véhicule; Non pliable; Autre
pl: Możliwość składania (składzania): Składane ramiona / uchwyty; Składany na płasko do przechowywania; Składany do góry przy pojeździe; Nieskładany; Inne
sk-SK: Skladateľnosť (na uloženie): Skladacie ramená/kolísky; Skladá sa naplocho pre uskladnenie; Sklápa sa k vozidlu; Neskladacie; Iné
bg-BG: Сгъваемост (процес на складиране): Сгъваеми рамене/държачи; Сгъва се до плоско състояние за съхранение; Сгъва се към автомобила; Несгъваем; Друг
cs: Rozložitelnost (uložení): Skládací ramena/kolébky; Lze složit/sklopit pro uskladnění; Sklopné k vozidlu; Neskládací; Jiné
tr: Katlanabilirlik (saklama): Katlanır kollar/kızaklar; Depolamak için düz katlanır; Araca doğru katlanır; Katlanmaz; Diğer
zh-CN: 可折叠性（收纳）: 折叠臂/支架; 折叠平放以便于收纳; 向上折叠贴紧车辆; 不可折叠; 其他
zh-TW: 可折疊收納性: 折疊臂/支架; 向下折疊/平放以便收納; 向上折疊貼合車輛; 不可折疊; 其他
vi: Khả năng gập (cất giữ): Cánh tay/khung đỡ gấp gọn; Gấp xuống/gấp phẳng để cất giữ; Gấp áp sát vào xe; Không gấp được; Khác
nl: Inklapbaarheid (opbergen): Inklapbare armen/houders; Plat inklapbaar voor opslag; Inklapbaar tegen voertuig; Niet-inklapbaar; Overige
el: Δυνατότητα αναδίπλωσης (φύλαξης): Αναδιπλούμενοι βραχίονες/βάσεις; Αναδιπλώνεται/γίνεται επίπεδο για αποθήκευση; Αναδιπλώνεται προς το όχημα; Μη αναδιπλούμενο; Άλλο
pt-BR: Capacidade de dobrar (acondicionamento): Braços/suportes dobráveis; Dobrável/plano para armazenamento; Dobra contra o veículo; Não dobrável; Outro
nb: Sammenleggbarhet (stuet bort): Sammenleggbare armer/holdere; Legges ned / flatt for oppbevaring; Felles opp mot kjøretøy; Ikke-sammenleggbar; Annet
sl-SI: Zložljivost (zlaganje): Zložljive roke/nosilci; Plosko zlaganje za shranjevanje; Zlaganje ob vozilo; Nezložljivo; Drugo
hr-HR: Sklopivost (sposobnost sklapanja): Sklopive ručice / nosači; Sklapa se / ravno za pohranu; Sklapa se uz vozilo; Nije sklopivo; Ostalo
ro-RO: Pliabilitate (strângere): Brațe/suporturi pliabile; Se pliază complet/plat pentru depozitare; Se pliază pe vehicul; Nepliabil; Altele
it: Pieghevolezza (stoccaggio): Bracci/supporti pieghevoli; Richiudibile in piano; Ripiegabile contro il veicolo; Non pieghevole; Altro
fi: Taitettavuus (varastointi): Taitettavat varret/pidikkeet; Taittuu alas/litteäksi säilytystä varten; Taittuu ylös ajoneuvoa vasten; Ei-taitettava; Muu
th: ความสามารถในการพับ (เก็บ): แขน/แท่นรองแบบพับได้; พับลง/แบนเพื่อจัดเก็บได้; พับขึ้นแนบกับรถ; พับไม่ได้; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Dobrável (acondicionamento): Braços/berços dobráveis; Dobra-se na horizontal para arrumação; Dobra-se contra o veículo; Não dobrável; Outro
de: Faltbarkeit (zum Verstauen): Faltbare Arme/Halterungen; Zur Aufbewahrung flach zusammenklappbar; Ans Fahrzeug hochklappbar; Nicht klappbar; Sonstiges
es: Plegabilidad (almacenaje): Brazos o soportes plegables; Plegable o plano para almacenar; Se pliega contra el vehículo; No plegable; Otro
da: Foldbarhed (opbevaring): Foldbare arme/støtter; Kan foldes ned/fladt til opbevaring; Kan foldes op mod køretøjet; Ikke-foldbar; Andet
sv: Vikbarhet (för förvaring): Fällbara armar/vaggor; Fälls ned/platt för förvaring; Fälls upp mot fordon; Ej hopfällbar; Övrigt
hu: Összecsukhatóság (elhelyezés): Összecsukható karok/bölcsők; Összecsukható/lapra hajtható tároláshoz; Járműhöz hajtható; Nem összecsukható; Egyéb
ru: Складная конструкция (хранение): Складные кронштейны/держатели; Складывается плоско для хранения; Складывается к кузову автомобиля; Нескладной; Другое
lt-LT: Sulankstomumas (laikymas): Sulenkiamos rankenos / lopšiai; Sulankstomas plokščiai saugojimui; Sulenkiamas prie transporto priemonės; Nesulankstomas; Kita
en: Foldability (stow): Folding arms/cradles; Folds down/flat for storage; Folds up against vehicle; Non-folding; Other
ko: 접이식(보관성): 접이식 암/크래들; 하단/수평 접이식(보관용); 차량 밀착 접이식; 비접이식; 기타
ja: 折りたたみ性（棚入れ）: 折りたたみ式アーム/クレードル; 収納用に平らに折りたたみ可能; 車両側に折りたたみ可能; 折りたたみ不可; その他